bg-BG: Стил на каране на сноуборд: Универсален сноуборд; Сноуборд в пресечена местност; Фрийрайд; Свободен стил сноуборд; Парк сноуборд; Сноуборд в дълбок сняг; Състезателен сноуборд; Други
sv: Snowboardåkning, stil: Allroundsnowboardsåkning; Vildmarkssnowboardåkning; Freeriding; Freestylesnowboardåkning; Snowboardåkning i park; Pudersnowboardåkning; Tävlingssnowboardåkning; Övrigt
fi: Lumilautailutyyli: Vuoristolumilautailu; Maastolumilautailu; Freeriding; Freestyle-lumilautailu; Puistolumilautailu; Puuterilumilautailu; Kilpalumilautailu; Muu
hu: Snowboardozás stílusa: All-mountain snowboardozás; Hátországi snowboardozás; Freeride; Freestyle snowboardozás; Park snowboardozás; Porhó snowboardozás; Versenysnowboardozás; Egyéb
pt-BR: Estilo de snowboard: Snowboard all-mountain; Snowboard backcountry; Freeride; Snowboard freestyle; Snowboard em parque; Snowboard em pó; Corrida de snowboard; Outro
pt-PT: Estilo snowboard: Snowboard de montanha; Snowboard em locais não vigiados; Freeriding; Snowboard freestyle; Snowboard em parque; Snowboard em neve macia; Corrida de snowboard; Outro
zh-TW: 單板滑雪風格: 全地域雪板; 山岳雪板; 自由式基礎滑雪; 花式滑雪板; 公園單板滑雪; 室內單板滑雪; 競賽單板滑雪; 其他
ru: Стиль сноубординга: Универсальный сноуборд; Сноубординг по пересеченной местности; Фрирайд; Фристайл; Парковый сноубординг; Сноубординг по целине; Гонки на сноуборде; Другое
nl: Snowboardstijl: Allmountain snowboarden; Off-piste snowboarden; Freeriden; Freestyle snowboarden; Parksnowboarden; Poedersnowboarden; Racesnowboarden; Andere
lt-LT: Snieglenčių sporto šaka: Kalnų snieglenčių sportas; Snieglenčių sportas užmiestyje; Mėgėjiškas; Laisvo stiliaus snieglenčių sportas; Parko snieglenčių sportas; Snieglenčių sportas biriu sniegu; Snieglenčių lenktynės; Kita
fr: Style de snowboard: Snowboard tout-terrain; Snowboard hors-piste; Freeride; Snowboard freestyle; Parc à neige; Snowboard en poudreuse; Snowboard de course; Autre
it: Stile di snowboard: Snowboard all-mountain; Snowboard fuori pista; Freeride; Snowboard freestyle; Snowboard nel parco; Snowboard fuoripista; Snowboard di gara; Altro
en: Snowboarding style: All-mountain snowboarding; Backcountry snowboarding; Freeriding; Freestyle snowboarding; Park snowboarding; Powder snowboarding; Race snowboarding; Other
ja: スノーボードのスタイル: オールマウンテンスノーボード; バックカントリースノーボード; フリーライド; フリースタイルスノーボード; パークスノーボード; パウダースノーボード; レーススノーボード; その他
sk-SK: Snowboardový štýl: All-mountain snowboarding; Backcountry snowboarding; Freeriding; Freestyle snowboarding; Parkový snowboarding; Práškový snowboarding; Závodný snowboarding; Iné
hr-HR: Stil snowboardinga: Sveplaninski snowboarding; Ruralni snowboarding; Izvan uređenih staza; Slobodni stil snowboardinga; Snowboarding u parku; Snowboarding izvan staza; Trkački snowboarding; Ostalo
zh-CN: 滑雪板样式: 全山地滑板滑雪; 野外滑板滑雪; 自由式; 自由式滑板滑雪; 旱地滑板滑雪; 粉雪滑板滑雪; 竞速滑板滑雪; 其他
el: Στυλ snowboard: Σνόουμπορντ σε όλο το βουνό; Backcountry snowboarding; Freeriding; Ελεύθερο σνόουμπορντ; Χιονοσανίδα; Σνόουμπορντ σε σκόνη; Χιονοσανίδα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip de snowboarding: Snowboarding montan; Snowboarding backcountry; Freeriding; Snowboarding freestyle; Snowboarding park; Snowboarding pe trasee nemarcate; Snowboarding sportiv; Altele
th: สไตล์การสโนว์บอร์ด: สโนว์บอร์ดออลเมาเท่น; สไนว์บอร์ดแบ็กคันทรี่; ฟรีไรดิ้ง; สโนว์บอร์ดฟรีสไตล์; สโนว์บอร์ดในลานหิมะ; สโนว์บอร์ดบนหิมะนุ่มบางเบา; แข่งสโนว์บอร์ด; อื่นๆ
pl: Styl snowboardowy: Snowboarding all-mountain; Snowboarding backcountry; Freeride; Snowboarding dowolny; Snowboarding parkourowe; Snowboarding w puchu; Snowboarding wyścigowy; Inne
cs: Druh snowboardingu: All-mountain snowboarding; Snowboarding backcountry; Freeride; Freestylový snowboarding; Parkový snowboarding; Snowboarding v prašanu; Závodní snowboarding; Jiné
de: Snowboarding-Stil: All-Mountain-Snowboarden; Tiefschnee-Snowboarden; Freeriding; Freestyle-Snowboarden; Park-Snowboarden; Tiefschnee-Snowboarden; Renn-Snowboarden; Sonstiges
es: Estilo de snowboarding: Snowboard de montaña; Snowboard de travesía; Estilo libre; Snowboard de estilo libre; Snowboard de parque; Snowboard en polvo; Snowboard de carrera; Otros
tr: Snowboard stili: Dağ boyu snowboard; Dağlık bölgede snowboard; Serbest sürüş; Serbest stil snowboard; Parkta snowboard; Toz snowboard; Yarış snowboardu; Diğer
sl-SI: Deskanje na snegu: Vsegorsko deskanje na snegu; Turno deskanje na snegu (teren, nedostopen z vlečnico); Deskanje po grbinah; Prosti slog; Deskanje na poligonu; Deskanje na prhkem snegu; Dirkalno deskanje; Drugo
nb: Snowboardstil: Fjell-snowboard; Backcountry snowboard; Freeride; Freestyle snowboard; Park-snowboard; Pudder-snowboard; Snowboard-race; Annet
da: Snowboarding-stil: All-mountain snowboarding; Backcountry snowboarding; Freeriding; Freestyle snowboarding; Parksnowboarding; Puddersnowboarding; Race-snowboarding; Andet
vi: Phong cách trượt ván trên tuyết: Trượt ván trên tuyết núi địa hình; Trượt ván vùng sâu vùng xa; Đạp xe tự do; Trượt ván đa dạng; Công viên trượt ván; Trượt ván trên khối băng dày; Cuộc đua trượt ván; Khác
ko: 스노보드 스타일: 올마운틴 스노보드; 백컨트리 스노보드; 프리라이딩; 프리스타일 스노보드; 파크 스노보드; 파우더 스노보드; 레이스 스노보드; 기타